Washington statutes.
RCW 7.07.903

Application to existing agreements or referrals.

(1) This chapter governs a mediation pursuant to a referral or an agreement to mediate made on or after January 1, 2006.

(2) If all parties agree in a signed record or a record of proceeding reflects such an agreement by all parties, then this chapter governs a mediation pursuant to a referral or an agreement to mediate whenever made.

[ 2005 c 172 s 22.]